Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 13 Dogs

4-13-1.
Regulatory ordinances — Enforcement and penalties.

City or town councils may make any ordinances concerning dogs in their cities or towns as they deem expedient, to be enforced by the destruction or disposition of the animal, or by pecuniary penalties not exceeding ten dollars ($10.00) for the first offense, not exceeding fifteen dollars ($15.00) for the second offense within a year, not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the third and any subsequent offense within a year to be recovered by action of debt, or by complaint and warrant, to use as that city council or town council may prescribe.

Barrington town council is authorized to enact an ordinance:

Permitting the animal control officer in the town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for violation of any animal control ordinance which may be paid by mail; and

To prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

Bristol town council is authorized to enact an ordinance permitting the dog officer in that town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any dog ordinance which may be paid by mail, and to prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

The Bristol town council may by ordinance prescribe the number of licensed dogs and their breeds which may be kept at any single-family residence other than a breeding kennel licensed under §

4-13-10

, and may enforce those ordinances by pecuniary penalties not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

Coventry town council is authorized to enact ordinances permitting the dog officer in the town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any dog ordinance which may be paid by mail.

Cumberland town council may prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding thirty dollars ($30.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

The town council of the town of Cumberland is authorized to enact an ordinance permitting the animal control officer or any police officer in that town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any dog ordinance which may be paid by mail.

The town council of the town of Cumberland is authorized to enact an ordinance establishing the expense of the impoundment of dogs as determined by the town council and providing for the payment to the town of the impoundment expense by the dog owner prior to removal of the dog from the pound.

Glocester town council is authorized to enact an ordinance to prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine not more than twenty dollars ($20.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine not more than thirty dollars ($30.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine not more than thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the third offense and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

Jamestown town council may prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

Middletown may prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows for the violation of animal control ordinances on any beach within the town of Middletown:

A fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the first (1st) offense within the calendar year;

A fine not exceeding one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for the second (2nd) offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) for the third (3rd) and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

Middletown may prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows for the violation of animal control ordinances anywhere else within the town:

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

The Middletown town council is authorized to enact an ordinance permitting the dog officer in that town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any dog ordinance which may be paid by mail.

Narragansett town council is authorized to enact an ordinance:

Permitting the animal control officer in the town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any animal control ordinance which may be paid by mail; and

Establishing the expense of the impoundment of dogs as determined by the town council and providing for the payment to the town of the impoundment expense by the dog owner prior to removal of the dog from the pound; and

Prescribing pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

Newport city council is authorized to enact an ordinance:

Permitting the animal control officer, and his or her agents, in that city to issue citations to the owners of dogs for violation of any animal control ordinance which may be paid by mail;

To prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

North Providence town council is authorized to enact an ordinance permitting the animal control officer in that town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any dog ordinance which may be paid by mail.

Portsmouth may prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding thirty dollars ($30.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

The Portsmouth town council is authorized to enact an ordinance permitting the dog officer in that town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any dog ordinance which may be paid by mail.

The Portsmouth town council may, by ordinance, prescribe the number of licensed dogs which may be kept at any single family residence other than a breeding kennel licensed under §

4-13-10

and may enforce those ordinances by pecuniary penalties not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

The Richmond town council is authorized to enact ordinances:

Establishing the following penalties for animal control offenses:

A fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense within one year;

A fine of not more than seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for the second offense within one year of the first offense;

A fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for the third and each subsequent offense within one year of the first offense.

Permitting the animal control officer or any police officer to issue citations for violation of any animal control ordinance punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) or less, and to provide for payment of those fines by mail.

Scituate town council may prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding thirty dollars ($30.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

Scituate town council is authorized to enact ordinances permitting the dog officer in the town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any dog ordinance which may be paid by mail.

Smithfield town council may prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding thirty dollars ($30.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

The Smithfield town council is authorized to enact an ordinance permitting the animal control warden in the town to issue citations which may be paid by mail to the owners of dogs for the violation of any dog ordinance in that town.

Tiverton town council may prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense;

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense;

A fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the third and each subsequent offense.

Warwick city council may prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year; and

A fine not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300) for the fourth and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

Westerly town council is authorized to enact an ordinance:

Permitting the animal control officer in the town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any animal control ordinance which may be paid by mail; and

Establishing the expense of the impoundment of dogs as determined by the town council and providing for the payment to the town of the impoundment expense by the dog owner prior to removal of the dog from the pound; and

Prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

West Greenwich town council is authorized to enact an ordinance:

Permitting the animal control officer in the town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any animal control ordinance which may be paid by mail; and

Establishing the expense of the impoundment of dogs as determined by the town council and providing for the payment to the town of the impoundment expense by the dog owner prior to removal of the dog from the pound; and

Prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

The town council of the town of Exeter is authorized to enact any ordinance prescribing fines and penalties, in addition to those otherwise allowed by law, as follows:

Providing a fine of up to twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense;

Providing a fine of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for the second offense; and

Providing a fine of up to two hundred dollars ($200) for the third and for any subsequent offenses within a one-year period. In addition, the town may require proof of owners liability insurance for a twelve-month (12) period insuring against injury and damages caused by the dog. That insurance shall be in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and shall name the town as a named insured for the purposes of notice.

West Warwick town council may prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine not exceeding fifteen dollars ($15.00) for the first offense;

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense;

A fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the third and each subsequent offense.

Woonsocket city council is authorized to enact an ordinance:

Permitting the animal control office of the city to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any animal control ordinance which may be paid by mail;

Establishing the expense of the impoundment of dogs as determined by the city council and providing for the payment to the city for the impoundment expense by the dog owner prior to removal of the dog from the pound; and

Prescribing pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

Pawtucket city council is authorized to prescribe pecuniary penalties directly related to its ordinance banning the owning or keeping of pit bulls in the city as follows:

For a pit bull properly licensed according to the city ordinance:

A fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the first offense;

A fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) on a second offense;

A fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) on a third offense.

For a pit bull that is not licensed pursuant to the exceptions in the city ordinance:

A fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) on a first offense;

A fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) on a second or subsequent offense.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, Pawtucket may through its municipal court impose a sentence of imprisonment not exceeding thirty (30) days in addition to the fines in subsection (b)(22)(ii)(A) or (B).

The Lincoln town council is authorized to prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

The Lincoln town council is authorized to enact an ordinance permitting the dog officer and police officers in that town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any dog ordinance, which citation may be paid by mail.

The East Providence city council is authorized to enact an ordinance permitting the animal control officer or any police officer in that city to issue citations to persons in violation of any animal ordinances, which may be paid by mail, and to prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine of not more than thirty dollars ($30.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than sixty dollars ($60.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than one hundred twenty dollars ($120) for the third offense within a calendar year; and

A fine of not more than three hundred dollars ($300) for the fourth offense and any subsequent offense within a calendar year.

The Warren town council is authorized to enact an ordinance permitting the animal control officer in the town to issue citations to the owners of animals for violation of any animal control ordinance which may be paid by mail, and to prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

The Burrillville town council is authorized to enact an ordinance:

Permitting the animal control officer in the town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any animal control ordinance which may be paid by mail; and

To prescribe penalties for violation of the provisions of revised general ordinances, Town of Burrillville, Rhode Island, 2004, as amended, Chapter 4, entitled “Animals”; and

Establishing an expense not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) for the day during which impoundment occurs plus five dollars ($5.00) every day the animal is detained and providing for the payment to the town of the impoundment expense by the dog owner prior to removal of the dog from the animal control facility.

The Foster town council is authorized to enact ordinances permitting the dog officer in the town to issue citations to the owners of dogs for the violation of any dog ordinance, which may be paid by mail, and may prescribe pecuniary penalties as follows:

A fine not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) for the first offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding thirty dollars ($30.00) for the second offense within a calendar year;

A fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for the third and each subsequent offense within a calendar year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-1

; P.L. 1970, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 480, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 276, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 500, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 470, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 38, § 1.

4-13-1.1.
Towns of Portsmouth, West Warwick, and Middletown and city of Woonsocket — Vicious dog ordinance.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section or the general laws to the contrary, the town councils of the towns of Portsmouth, West Warwick and Middletown may, by ordinance, provide that the owner or keeper of any dog that assaults any person shall be fined an amount not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) to be used as that city or town council may prescribe. However, this fine shall not be imposed unless the officer responsible for enforcement of that ordinance has conducted an investigation of the assault and has certified that the dog was off the property of its owner or keeper and at large at the time the assault occurred or that the assault resulted from the negligence of the owner or keeper.

In the city of Woonsocket an owner shall not be declared negligent if an injury or damage is sustained by a person who, at the time that injury or damage was sustained, was committing a trespass or other tort upon premises occupied by the owner or keeper of the dog, or was teasing, tormenting, provoking, abusing or assaulting the dog or was committing or attempting to commit a crime.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 480, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 372, § 1.

4-13-1.2.
Definitions.

“Adequate shelter” means the provision of and access to shelter that is suitable for the species, age, condition, size, and type of each dog; provides sufficient space for the dog to maintain comfortable rest, normal posture, and range of movement; and is safe to protect each dog from injury, rain, sleet, snow, hail, direct sunlight, the adverse effects of heat or cold, physical suffering, and impairment of health. Shelters with wire grid or slat floors that permit the dog’s feet to pass through the openings, sag under the dog’s weight, or otherwise do not protect the dog’s feet from injury, are not considered adequate shelter.

“Board” means the rabies control board.

“Department” means the department of environmental management or its successor.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management (or its successor), or his or her designee.

“Division” means the division of agriculture.

“Guardian” means a person(s) having the same rights and responsibilities as an owner or keeper, and the terms may be used interchangeably. A guardian shall also mean a person who possesses, has title to or an interest in, harbors or has control, custody, or possession of an animal and who is responsible for an animal’s safety and well-being.

“Livestock” means domesticated animals that are commonly held in moderate contact with humans which include, but are not limited to, cattle, bison, equines, sheep, goats, llamas, and swine.

“Owner or keeper” means any person or agency keeping, harboring, or having charge or control of or responsibility for control of an animal or any person or agency that permits any dog, cat, ferret, or domestic animal to habitually be fed within that person’s yard or premises. This term shall not apply to veterinary facilities, any licensed boarding kennel, municipal pound, pet shop, or animal shelter.

“Person” means an individual, firm, joint stock company, partnership, association, private or municipal corporation, trust, estate, state, commission, political subdivision, any interstate body, the federal government or any agency or subdivision of the federal government, other government entity, or other legal entity.

“Pets” means domesticated animals kept in close contact with humans, which include, but may not be limited to, dogs, cats, ferrets, equines, llamas, goats, sheep, and swine.

“Quarantine” means the removal, isolation, the close confinement, or related measures of an animal under conditions and for time periods that are set by regulation of the board.

“Tether” means the practice of fastening a dog to a stationary object or stake by a chain, rope, or other tethering device as a means of keeping the dog under control. A dog being walked on a leash is not tethered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 10; P.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 4; P.L. 2012, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 198, § 1.

4-13-1.3.
Rabies control board.

There shall be a rabies control board consisting of seven (7) people as follows:

The director of the Rhode Island department of environmental management, or his or her designee;

The director of the Rhode Island department of health, or his or her designee;

A Rhode Island licensed veterinarian, appointed by the governor, who is a member of the Rhode Island Veterinary Medical Association;

A livestock farmer, appointed by the governor, who is a member of the Rhode Island Farm Bureau;

A member of a recognized Rhode Island humane group (such as the Rhode Island Society for Prevention of Cruelty to Animals), appointed by the governor;

The state veterinarian, who shall serve as chairperson;

A person employed as an animal control officer by a Rhode Island municipality, and who is recommended to serve on the rabies control board by the league of cities and towns, and who is appointed by the governor.

All appointments made under this section after April 20, 2006, shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate. The members of the board shall serve without compensation. The board members from the departments of health and environmental management shall serve at the discretion of their directors. The state veterinarian shall serve without term. Nongovernmental members shall serve for a period of three (3) years and reappointments shall be made by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate.

Vacancies for citizen members shall be filled by appointment, in the same manner as the original appointment, for the unexpired term only. Four (4) members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

Members of the board shall be removable by the governor pursuant to §

36-1-7

and for cause only. Removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

The board may elect from among its members such other officers as it deems necessary.

The director of the department of environmental management shall direct staff to support the board within the constraints of available resources.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the board shall approve and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, including meeting minutes, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended, including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, a summary of any clerical, administrative, or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings, and remedies; a synopsis of any legal matters related to the authority of the board; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to subsection (h); a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision.

Newly appointed and qualified members and new designees of ex officio members of the board are required to complete a training course within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the board, approved by the board, and conducted by the chair of the board. The board may approve the use of any board or staff members or other individuals to assist with training. The course shall include instruction in the following areas: chapters 13 of title 4, 46 of title 42, 14 of title 36 and 2 of title 38; and the board’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of April 20, 2006, prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 46 of title 42, 14 of title 36 and 2 of title 38.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 22, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 27, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 47; P.L. 2017, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 28, § 1.

4-13-2.
Tax imposed by cities and towns — Enactment of local laws to prevent damage to livestock.

The city or town council of any city or town may impose a yearly tax upon every person in their city or town for every dog owned or kept by him or her as the council shall judge proper; and also make any laws to prevent damage to sheep and cattle as they may deem necessary.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-2

.

4-13-3.
Prior ordinances preserved.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as to repeal any ordinance concerning dogs, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, which has been passed by any town or city council.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-3

.

4-13-4.
Dog licenses — Fees — Penalties.

Every owner or keeper of a dog shall annually, in April, obtain a license effective May 1 through the office of the city or town clerk of the city or town in which the owner or keeper resides.

The fees for the license shall be five dollars ($5.00).

No city or town shall issue any license under this section unless the dog has been inoculated against rabies for the period of time which the license would be valid.

All licenses issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be valid in every city or town during the then-current year.

Any person who becomes the owner or keeper of a dog shall obtain a license within thirty (30) days after he or she becomes the owner or keeper.

The Cumberland town clerk may issue a license renewable every two (2) years for a licensing fee of six dollars ($6.00).

Glocester town council may provide for an annual licensing fee of fourteen dollars ($14.00) for all dogs, except spayed or neutered females and males, and for an annual licensing fee of seven dollars ($7.00) for spayed or neutered female and male dogs.

Jamestown town council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) for neutered dogs, and not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for unneutered dogs.

Newport city council may, however, provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee of not more than ten dollars ($10.00) for all spayed and neutered dogs, and for an annual licensing fee of not more than fifteen dollars ($15.00) for unspayed females and unneutered males.

North Smithfield town council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee of five dollars ($5.00) for all dogs.

South Kingstown town council may provide for an annual licensing fee of twelve dollars ($12.00) for all dogs, except spayed or neutered female and male dogs, and for an annual licensing fee of seven dollars ($7.00) for spayed or neutered female and male dogs.

The South Kingstown town council may assess an impound fee.

Westerly town council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual license fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for unspayed female dogs and unneutered male dogs;

May provide for a fee of one dollar ($1.00) for the replacement of lost dog tags;

May provide that no fee be charged to license guide dogs used by persons with disabilities;

May provide for the number of licensed dogs which may be kept at any single-family residence, other than a breeding kennel; and

May provide for pecuniary penalties not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for violations.

Woonsocket city council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee of five dollars ($5.00) for all dogs.

West Warwick town council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual license fee of seven dollars ($7.00) for each neutered male or spayed female and fifteen dollars ($15.00) for each unneutered male and unspayed female.

May provide, by ordinance, for a payment of a two dollars ($2.00) fee for duplicate or for replacement tags.

Pawtucket city council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) for spayed or neutered dogs, and not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for unspayed or unneutered dogs.

May provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee for dogs owned by residents age 65 or older not to exceed five dollars ($5.00) for spayed or neutered dogs, and not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) for unspayed or unneutered dogs.

Scituate town council may provide, by ordinance, for an annual license fee not to exceed twenty ($20.00) dollars for all dogs.

Burrillville town council may:

Provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee of not more than ten dollars ($10.00) for all dogs; and

Provide for pecuniary penalties not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for violations.

The Middletown town council may:

Provide, by ordinance, for an annual licensing fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per dog.

Foster town council may:

Provide, by ordinance, for an annual or biennial licensing fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) for all dogs; and

Provide for pecuniary damages not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for violations.

Every person, owning or keeping a dog not licensed and/or collared according to the provisions of this chapter, shall be fined ten dollars ($10.00) to be applied to the support of the city or town, and that fine shall be in addition to all other lawful fees.

Any city or town may waive the fee to be charged to license guide dogs used by persons with disabilities.

In the city of Woonsocket, every person owning or keeping a dog not licensed and/or collared according to the provisions of this chapter shall be fined fifty dollars ($50.00) for the first offense; one hundred dollars ($100) for the second offense; and one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for the third and subsequent offenses.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-4

; P.L. 1970, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 445, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 70, § 1; 1992, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 242, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 297, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 310, § 1.

4-13-4.1.
Notice to new owner of inoculation and licensing requirements.

It is unlawful for any dog pound, animal shelter, kennel, pet store, or any other facility licensed pursuant to chapter 19 of this title to sell, give away, or adopt out any dog without providing the new owner with a form indicating that inoculation against rabies and permanent licensing are required within thirty (30) days.

The facility shall also require the new owner to sign a register indicating that the new owner has received a form and register shall also contain the name and address of the new owner and shall be permanently maintained by the facility.

The person obtaining a dog in this manner is required to have this dog inoculated against rabies and obtain a permanent license within thirty (30) days.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section is subject to the penalty provisions of §

4-13-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 388, § 1.

4-13-5.
License information and record.

Every owner or keeper of a dog applying for a license as provided for in §

4-13-4

shall furnish the city or town clerk with the following information: name and address of owner or keeper, and breed, sex, color, and name of dog to be licensed. The city or town clerk shall assign a registered number for each dog licensed and shall enter on the license the registered number, name, and address of the owner or keeper, and the breed, sex, color, and name of the dog licensed, and shall keep a record of all licenses issued.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 10; P.L. 1916, ch. 1384, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-5

; P.L. 1970, ch. 196, § 1.

4-13-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 135, § 10; P.L. 1916, ch. 1384, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-6

; Repealed by P.L. 1970, ch. 196, § 2.

4-13-7.
Notice as to time and place of issuing licenses.

The city or town clerks of the several cities and towns shall annually, in the month of March, give notice by publication at least once in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or town, giving notice to the people of the time and place for issuing the licenses provided for in this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 19; G.L. 1932, ch. 136, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-7

; P.L. 1970, ch. 196, § 1.

4-13-8.
Disposition of license fees.

Towns and cities may adopt ordinances or regulations concerning the use of money received, but where no ordinances or regulations are adopted, town and city clerks shall issue licenses and receive the money and pay the money into the treasury of the city or town retaining fifty cents (50¢) for his or her own use for each license issued.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-8

; P.L. 1962, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 196, § 1.

4-13-9.
Pups exempt from license.

No license shall be required for any dog under the age of six (6) months.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 111, § 29; P.L. 1897, ch. 462, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 30; G.L. 1976, §

4-13-9

.